Delaware, session 153, HB74.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 321, Title 18 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 321. Examination report. (h) No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information occurs as a result of disclosure to the Commissioner under this section.